Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.120

Licensure—Application form—Fee.

Applications for licensure shall be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation which reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for licensure provided in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. All applicants shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1997 c 334 s 10; 1996 c 191 s 77; 1991 c 3 s 235; 1987 c 415 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.